Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
PART 7
DIVISION OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Editor's note:

This part 7 was added with relocations in 2002. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act enacting this part 7, see section 1 of chapter 121, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

28-5-701. Division of veterans affairs - transfer of functions - terminology.

There is created the division of veterans affairs in the department of military and veterans affairs, the head of which is the director of the division of veterans affairs who is appointed by the adjutant general acting in the adjutant general's capacity as the administrative head of the department. The director shall appoint such assistants and clerical employees as may be deemed necessary to effectively administer this part 7 and part 8 of this article 5. The director and such assistants and employees must be appointed pursuant to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution. The division of veterans affairs and the director of the division of veterans affairs are type 2 entities, as defined in section 24-1-105.

Whenever any law of this state refers to the Colorado department of veterans affairs or to the veterans affairs section, said law shall be construed as referring to the division of veterans affairs.

The division and the board shall, on and after July 1, 2002, execute, administer, perform, and enforce the rights, powers, duties, functions, and obligations vested in the department of human services pursuant to articles 9 and 10 of title 26, C.R.S., prior to said date. On and after July 1, 2002, any officers or employees of the department of human services whose primary duties were to carry out the functions specified in articles 9 and 10 of title 26, C.R.S., prior to said date and whose duties and functions concerned the duties and functions transferred to the division pursuant to this part 7 and part 8 of this article, and whose employment in the division is deemed necessary by the director to carry out the purposes of this article shall be transferred to the department and become employees thereof. Such employees shall retain all rights to the personnel system and retirement benefits pursuant to the laws of this state, and their services shall be deemed to have been continuous. All transfers and any abolishment of positions in the state personnel system shall be made and processed in accordance with state personnel system laws and regulations.

On July 1, 2002, all items of property, real and personal, including office furniture and fixtures, books, documents, and records of the department of human services prior to said date pertaining to the duties and functions transferred to the division pursuant to this part 7 and part 8 of this title are transferred to the department and become the property thereof.

On or before September 1, 2002, the department of human services and the department of military and veterans affairs shall agree on the method, scope, and procedures for the transfer of any property, mineral, and water rights involving the western slope military veterans cemetery, as described in section 28-5-708, in order to ensure that the use of said cemetery is continuous and consistent with federal law.

The general assembly requests the department of human services and the state board of land commissioners to transfer, without compensation, by any procedure necessary, any appropriate property, mineral, and water rights involving the western slope military veterans' cemetery, as described in section 28-5-708, to the department of military and veterans affairs, within two months of the completion of a legal survey of the property described in section 28-5-708.

The general assembly further requests the department of human services and the state board of land commissioners to report to the state, veterans, and military affairs committees of the senate and house of representatives, or their successor committees, no later than July 15, 2005, that the transfer of appropriate property, mineral, and water rights requested in paragraph (c) of this subsection (4) has been completed.

Whenever the department of human services is referred to or designated by a contract or other document in connection with the duties and functions transferred to the division pursuant to this part 7 and part 8 of this article, such reference or designation shall be deemed to apply to the department of military and veterans affairs. All contracts entered into by the department of human services prior to July 1, 2002, in connection with the duties and functions transferred to the department of military and veterans affairs pursuant to this part 7 and part 8 of this article are hereby validated, with the department of military and veterans affairs succeeding to all the rights and obligations of such contracts. Any appropriations of funds from prior fiscal years open to satisfy obligations incurred pursuant to such contracts are hereby transferred and appropriated to the department for the payment of such obligations.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 344, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(4)(c) and (4)(d) added, p. 1032, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3417, § 189, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-10-101 as it existed prior to 2002.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

28-5-702. Board of veterans affairs.

The Colorado board of veterans affairs and its powers, duties, and functions are transferred from the department of human services to the department of military and veterans affairs. The board shall advise and consult with the division in the administration and enforcement of this article 5. The Colorado board of veterans affairs is a type 2 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105.

The board consists of seven members appointed by the governor and confirmed by the senate, who shall be veterans who have been honorably released or separated from the armed forces of the United States, but who need not be members of a veterans service organization. The governor shall appoint members for terms of four years; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than four members' terms expire in the same year. Terms begin the day after the expiration of a preceding term. Vacancies occurring during any term shall be filled by the governor for the unexpired portion of the term in which they occur. If a vacancy occurs while the senate is not in session, the governor shall appoint a qualified person to discharge the duties thereof until the next meeting of the senate, at which time the governor shall nominate a person to fill the vacancy, which nomination shall be subject to senate confirmation. Members of the board shall hold office until their successors are appointed by the governor. Not more than four of the members serving at any one time shall be members of the same political party.

The members of the board shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed, out of any funds appropriated to the division, for actual and necessary traveling expenses and other expenses incurred in the performance of official duties.

The members of the board shall select one of their members to serve as the chair of the board and one to serve as the vice-chair of the board, for a term of two years for each office. Such officers shall hold office at the pleasure of the board. The board shall also appoint a secretary who may or may not be a member as the board may determine. The secretary shall attend all meetings of the board, keep a full and true record of its proceedings, preserve at its general office all its books, documents, and papers, and perform such other duties as the board may prescribe.

The board shall hold meetings at such times and at such places as shall be determined by it. Special meetings may be called at any time by the chair or vice-chair and shall be called at the request of any three members.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 345, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(6) amended, p. 468, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(6) repealed, (SB 17-212), ch. 275, p. 1512, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 71, § 94, effective February 25; (1) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3418, § 190, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-10-103 as it existed prior to 2002.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

28-5-703. Rules - duties.

The board shall propose for adoption by the adjutant general such rules and regulations, not in conflict with this article or other laws, as it may deem necessary to govern the programs administered pursuant to this article.

Any rules adopted by the board of human services in accordance with the requirements of the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., relating to county veterans service offices and veterans affairs other than the veterans community living centers shall be enforceable and shall be valid until amended or repealed by the adjutant general.

The division shall be responsible for the proper administration of this article. The board shall study periodically the problems of veterans and based on such studies shall propose such program or statutory changes as it may deem advisable or necessary for veterans' assistance by the state of Colorado or political subdivisions thereof. The board shall make a continuing study of any program put into effect. The board shall perform such other duties as may be assigned to it by law and shall advise and assist the governor, any department in the executive branch, and the general assembly or any committee thereof in regard to veterans' matters.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before December 31, 2002, and on or before December 31 each year thereafter, the board, with the assistance of the division, shall report on the status of all programs providing services to the state's veterans, including but not limited to any recommendations for changes to policies, procedures, or law, to:

The governor;

The state, veterans, and military affairs committee of the house of representatives; and

The state, veterans, and military affairs committee of the senate.

The board shall serve in an advisory capacity to:

The state board of human services and the department of human services regarding the operations and maintenance of veterans community living centers operated pursuant to article 12 of title 26, C.R.S.;

The division of employment and training in the department of labor and employment regarding the provision of services to state veterans pursuant to the "Colorado Career Advancement Act", part 2 of article 83 of title 8;

The department of revenue regarding the issuance of special license plates to veterans and active or retired military personnel; and

Any department, division, board, or other entity that provides services specifically to state veterans, and any executive director, director, board, or other entity that has rule-making authority pursuant to state law regarding proposed rules that are directed specifically to veterans.

The board shall determine whether a person is a discharged LGBT veteran pursuant to section 28-5-103.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 346, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3)(c) amended, p. 2012, § 105, effective May 22.

L. 2012:

(4)(b) amended, (HB 12-1120), ch. 27, p. 110, § 28, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

(4)(a) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1692, § 88, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(1)(b) and (4)(a) amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 274, § 31, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

IP(3) amended, (HB 17-1255), ch. 248, p. 1045, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(4)(b) amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1715, § 66, effective May 29.

L. 2021:

(5) added, (SB 21-026), ch. 42, p. 174, § 4, effective November 11.

28-5-703.5. Notice to revisor of statutes - repeal.

The resource and legislative director of the department of military and veterans affairs shall notify the revisor of statutes in writing of the date on which the federal government created the Space National Guard in the "FY 2022 National Defense Authorization Act" by e-mailing the notice to revisorofstatutes.ga@state.co.us.

This section is repealed, effective July 1 of the year following the revisor of statutes' receipt of the notice required by subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1231), ch. 206, p. 1078, § 10, effective May 28.

28-5-704. Departments to cooperate.

To effectuate the purpose of this article, the governor may direct any department, division, board, bureau, commission, or agency of the state, or any political subdivision thereof, to:

Cooperate with and assist and advise the division and the board in the performance of their duties and functions under this article and to provide such other assistance and data as will enable the division and the board to properly carry out their activities and effectuate the purposes of this article; and

Coordinate with, seek advice from, or utilize as a resource the division and the board in implementing programs that provide services specifically to state veterans.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 347, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-10-105 as it existed prior to 2002.

28-5-705. Duties.

The division, in accordance with its rules, shall perform the following duties and functions:

Formulate, establish, and supervise a plan and standard procedures to further prompt and efficient service to all veterans in the state of Colorado on a uniform basis, whether by the division or by any county veterans service office;

Establish and maintain liaison with all county veterans service officers and advise them of such plan and procedures;

Make reasonable requests of such county veterans service officers for their cooperation in the execution of such plan and procedures and in the handling of veterans' cases and other matters;

Maintain liaison with the veterans administration and other appropriate agencies of the federal government;

Provide all county veterans service officers with pertinent information, suggestions, forms, rulings, and other material in such form and in such manner as the division may deem appropriate to assist all county veterans service officers in the performance of their duties;

Distribute to such county veterans service officers any available bulletins, manuals, pamphlets, or other appropriate material, prepared either by the division or elsewhere, for the purposes stated in this section; and

Do such additional things, including the holding of conferences, whenever advisable, with the county veterans service officers either in their counties or in the office of the division or elsewhere and either singly or in groups, as the division may deem advisable to assist such officers in the proper performance of their duties and to keep them properly advised of current developments in the veterans' field;

Render personal service to members and former members, or the surviving spouses, administrators, executors, conservators, guardians, or heirs of members or former members, of the Colorado state defense force and the Colorado National Guard in any claim they may have against the state or federal government;

Assist all discharged members of the armed forces of the United States, the surviving spouses, administrators, executors, conservators, guardians, or heirs of any such veterans, or any other persons who may have proper claims by filing and prosecuting such claims on behalf of such persons for insurance, pensions, compensation, hospitalization, vocational training, education, loans, readjustment allowances, or any other benefits which such persons may be or may become entitled to receive under any of the laws of the United States, the state of Colorado, or any other state by reason of such service;

Cooperate with and assist veterans' organizations, county veterans service officers, veterans' advisory groups, and all other organizations, now in existence or formed on or after July 1, 1973, which provide assistance to those persons mentioned in paragraph (c) of this subsection (1);

Perform services in this state for the veterans administration on a contractual, grant, or other basis, and perform such other duties and render such other services in furtherance of the purposes of this article or any other law in providing reasonable and proper assistance to veterans;

Establish a training and certification program for newly appointed county veterans service officers. Such program shall be presented to the board for approval prior to implementation or modification.

Prepare, develop, construct, and maintain a state military veterans' cemetery pursuant to section 28-5-708 and seek reimbursement from the federal department of veterans affairs for all allowable costs for the project as permitted by federal law; and

Make reasonable efforts to notify members of the armed forces of the United States who are planning their return to civilian life and are located in Colorado, or intend to relocate to Colorado upon discharge, of the requirements in sections 12-20-202 (1)(b), (1)(d), (1)(e), (2), (3), and (4) and 42-2-403.

Establish a consistent and uniform process to determine whether a veteran qualifies as a discharged LGBT veteran, as described in section 28-5-103.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 347, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(1)(g) amended and (1)(h) added, (SB 16-134), ch. 195, p. 686, § 2, effective May 27.

L. 2019:

(1)(h) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1716, § 206, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(1)(i) added, (SB 21-026), ch. 42, p. 174, § 5, effective November 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-10-106 as it existed prior to 2002.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Restoration of Honor Act") in SB 21-026, see section 1 of chapter 42, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

28-5-706. Contributions to division - veterans private contributions fund - created.

Any city, county, or political subdivision of the state or any association or individual may contribute funds, services, or facilities to the department, and the adjutant general may accept and use such funds, services, or facilities for the purpose or purposes intended by the contributor; except that no fund, service, or facility shall be accepted if the conditions attached thereto require the use or expenditure thereof in a manner contrary to law. Any said funds shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the veterans private contributions fund, which fund is hereby created.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 349, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-10-107 as it existed prior to 2002.

28-5-707. Assistance to county veterans service officers.

The division shall provide satisfactory supervision, direction, and assistance to all county veterans service officers and shall provide such services and facilities to the county veterans service officers as may be determined by the division to be necessary. Out of any moneys appropriated by the general assembly to the division for support to county veterans service officers, the division is authorized to issue vouchers for the semiannual payment to the general fund of each county, to be disbursed upon the authority of the county commissioners thereof, only for the purposes of this part 7 and part 8 of this article. The division shall annually establish the rate of state-funded payments for full-time and part-time county veterans service officers based on the available appropriation by the general assembly; except that, if a county is receiving payments under paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) for a veterans service office established for adjacent counties, the payment shall be the total of the semiannual payments for the counties that have jointly formed the veterans service office.

If adjacent counties jointly establish a veterans service office for the counties pursuant to section 28-5-801 (2), the division may issue a voucher to the general fund of the county containing the veterans service office in an amount equal to the total of the semiannual payments that would have been provided to each of such counties under paragraph (a) of this subsection (1).

Such semiannual payments shall be made only on application by such county commissioners to the division, which application shall state and certify the amount such county commissioners have authorized to be disbursed for such purposes out of other moneys in such county general fund for the period covered by the application.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 349, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(1)(a) amended, HB 15-1315, ch. 219, p. 806, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-10-108 as it existed prior to 2002.

28-5-708. Western slope veterans' cemetery - fund - rules.

There is hereby established in the state treasury the western slope military veterans' cemetery fund, referred to in this section as the "fund". The division is authorized to accept gifts, grants, contributions, and donations for the purposes of this section. The fund shall consist of such moneys received through gifts, grants, contributions, or donations, from any person or entity, and any moneys appropriated to the fund by the general assembly. Any interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. At the end of any fiscal year, all unexpended and unencumbered moneys in the fund shall remain therein and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or any other fund.

Subject to available appropriations, the division may contract for professional services necessary for the implementation of this section.

The general assembly hereby authorizes the establishment and maintenance of a state military veterans' cemetery for the western slope, referred to in this section as the "cemetery". The division is directed to prepare, develop, construct, and maintain such cemetery at the site described in paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of this section. The division may enter into contracts or agreements with any person or public or private entity to prepare, develop, construct, operate, and maintain such cemetery. The cemetery shall be for the purpose of providing for the interment of Colorado residents who are military veterans and their spouses and dependents, as determined by the division. In addition, the adjutant general by rule may permit the interment of other veterans and their spouses and dependents in the cemetery and permit the division to assess a reasonable fee for the interment of such non-Colorado residents. All such fees collected shall be credited to the fund created pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section. The adjutant general, in consultation with the board, shall promulgate such rules as may be necessary to establish and maintain the cemetery in compliance with applicable state and federal statutes and rules.

The general assembly may appropriate moneys from the general fund to the fund for the implementation of this section, including but not limited to the payment of costs associated with the operation and maintenance of the cemetery.

If the entire general fund appropriation made to the department of human services, for allocation to the division of veterans affairs, for the fiscal year that commenced on July 1, 1999, is not needed to pay the costs for design and construction of the cemetery, the remainder of such appropriation may be used prior to July 1, 2002, by the department of human services and on or after July 1, 2002, by the department to pay any costs associated with the operation and maintenance of the cemetery without further appropriation by the general assembly.

Any appropriation made on and after July 1, 2002, for the operation and maintenance of the cemetery shall be appropriated to the department of military and veterans affairs.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that any use of the property described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3) as the cemetery is for a public purpose expressly authorized by the general assembly and therefore permissible under any grant of right-of-way applicable to such property executed by the state board of land commissioners.

The division, in preparing, developing, constructing, and maintaining the cemetery, may use for such purposes a parcel consisting of approximately twenty acres of unimproved property within the eastern portion of the real property known as the Grand Junction regional center and shall enter into all necessary agreements to secure the appropriate property rights for such parcel.

The division is hereby authorized to provide for surveys, engineering studies, conceptual and architectural plans, environmental impact studies, and other similar preliminary design and construction work as part of the pre-application for funding approval by the federal department of veterans affairs for the cemetery. The division is authorized to seek full reimbursement for such pre-application and design work from the federal department of veterans affairs.

The general assembly shall appropriate annually from the fund to the department, for allocation to the division, for any costs associated with the operation and maintenance of the cemetery and for the implementation of this section.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 349, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-10-110 as it existed prior to 2002.

28-5-709. Colorado state veterans trust fund - created - report.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the Colorado state veterans trust fund, which consists of the moneys transferred thereto pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. In addition, the state treasurer may credit to the trust fund any public or private gifts, grants, or donations received prior to July 1, 2002, by the department of human services or, on or after July 1, 2002, by the department of military and veterans affairs for implementation of the purposes specified in this subsection (1).

The moneys in the trust fund shall be used for:

Capital improvements or needed amenities for existing or future veterans community living centers;

(I.5) Repealed.

Costs incurred by existing or future state veterans cemeteries;

Costs incurred by the division; and

Veterans programs operated by nonprofit veterans organizations that meet criteria adopted by the board and that are selected by the board as grant recipients.

Repealed.

The division may retain up to five percent of the amount annually appropriated from the trust fund for the actual costs incurred by the division and the board in implementing the provisions of this article 5. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-36-114, all interest derived from the deposit and investment of money in the trust fund shall be credited to the trust fund. All unexpended and unencumbered money remaining in the trust fund at the end of any fiscal year shall remain in the trust fund and shall neither revert to the general fund nor be transferred or credited to any other fund.

Pursuant to section 24-75-1104.5 (1.7)(l), C.R.S., and except as otherwise provided in section 24-75-1104.5 (5), C.R.S., beginning in the 2016-17 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter so long as the state receives moneys pursuant to the master settlement agreement, the state treasurer shall annually transfer to the trust fund one percent of the total amount received by the state pursuant to the provisions of the master settlement agreement, other than attorney fees and costs, during the preceding fiscal year. The state treasurer shall transfer the amount specified in this subsection (2) from moneys credited to the tobacco litigation settlement cash fund created in section 24-22-115, C.R.S.

Repealed.

All of the funds appropriated to the trust fund pursuant to subsection (2) of this section in fiscal year 2000-01 shall be credited to the trust fund and retained as principal in the trust fund.
(3) (a) (I) All of the funds appropriated to the trust fund pursuant to subsection (2) of this section in fiscal year 2000-01 shall be credited to the trust fund and retained as principal in the trust fund.

For fiscal years 2001-02 through 2005-06, seventy-five percent of the amount of annual appropriations made pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, shall be credited to the trust fund and retained as principal in the trust fund. For fiscal years 2001-02 through 2005-06, twenty-five percent of the amount of annual appropriations made pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, and one hundred percent of any interest earned on the principal in the trust fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly and may be allocated by the board for the purposes outlined in subsection (1) of this section.

For fiscal years 2006-07 and 2007-08, seventy-five percent of the amount of the annual transfer made pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be credited to the trust fund and retained as principal in the trust fund. For fiscal years 2006-07 and 2007-08, twenty-five percent of the amount of the annual transfer made pursuant to subsection (2) of this section and one hundred percent of any interest earned on the principal in the trust fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly and may be allocated by the board for the purposes outlined in subsection (1) of this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3):

For the 2003-04 through 2006-07 fiscal years, twenty-five percent of the amount of annual transfers made pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be credited to the trust fund and retained as principal in the trust fund, and seventy-five percent of the amount of annual transfers made pursuant to subsection (2) of this section and one hundred percent of any interest earned on the principal in the trust fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly and may be allocated by the board for the purposes outlined in subsection (1) of this section.

For the 2007-08 fiscal year, thirty-five percent of the amount of the annual transfer made pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be credited to the trust fund and retained as principal in the trust fund, and sixty-five percent of the amount of the annual transfer made pursuant to subsection (2) of this section and one hundred percent of any interest earned on the principal in the trust fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly and may be allocated by the board for the purposes outlined in subsection (1) of this section.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (HB 09-1329), ch. 393, p. 2122, § 1, effective June 2, 2009.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (HB 09-1329), ch. 393, p. 2122, § 1, effective June 2, 2009.)

For the 2008-09 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, ten percent of the amount of the annual transfer made pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be credited to the trust fund and retained as principal in the trust fund, and ninety percent of the amount of the annual transfer made pursuant to subsection (2) of this section and one hundred percent of any interest earned on the principal in the trust fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly.

(3.5) Repealed.

Funds shall be allocated out of the trust fund using the following process:

The director of the state and veterans nursing homes or the director of the division of veterans affairs shall submit to the board a written request for funds to be used for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section; or

A nonprofit veterans organization, in compliance with the procedures and timelines adopted by the board, shall submit to the board a grant application, in a form adopted by the board, requesting funding for a veterans program.

The board shall vote on each request for funds and on each grant application submitted by a nonprofit veterans organization that meets the criteria established by the board. A majority vote shall be sufficient to approve an allocation of moneys out of the trust fund.

The board shall adopt guidelines that address, at a minimum, the following issues:

The form of an application for use by nonprofit veterans organizations in applying for grants pursuant to this section;

Criteria for identifying nonprofit veterans organizations that may apply for and receive grants pursuant to this section;

Criteria for selecting appropriate veterans programs to receive grants pursuant to this section;

The term and amounts of grants awarded to nonprofit veterans organizations pursuant to this section; and

Standards for determining the effectiveness of veterans programs that receive grants pursuant to this section.

The department may contract with one or more private or public entities for program monitoring and evaluation of any veterans program operated by a nonprofit veterans organization that receives funding pursuant to this section. The board may allocate funds to the division for the costs incurred in entering into such contracts.

The board shall prepare a report evaluating the implementation of this section, including the number and type of improvements or additions to nursing homes that have been made, the number and type of improvements to veterans cemeteries, the number of veterans served through the veterans outreach program, the number and types of veterans programs operated by nonprofit veterans organizations that receive grants pursuant to this section, and the results achieved as a result of allocations made out of the trust fund.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part added with relocations, p. 351, § 3, effective July 1; (1)(a) amended, p. 689, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3.5) added, p. 464, § 6, effective March 5; (1)(b)(III), (2)(a), and (3) amended, p. 2565, § 9, effective June 5.

L. 2004:

(2)(a) amended and (2)(b) repealed, p. 1713, §§ 15, 16, effective June 4.

L. 2005:

(1)(b)(I.5) added, p. 597, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(a), (2)(a), (3)(a), and (3)(b)(I) amended, pp. 1040, 1041, §§ 11, 13, effective May 25; (3)(b) amended, p. 1108, § 1, effective May 25; (1)(a) amended, p. 145, § 25, effective August 7.

L. 2008:

(3.5) amended, p. 867, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 09-269), ch. 333, p. 1769, § 10, effective June 1; (3)(a)(III), (3)(b)(I)(C), (3)(b)(I)(D), (3)(b)(I)(E), and (3)(b)(II) amended and (3)(c) added, (HB 09-1329), ch. 393, pp. 2122, 2123, §§ 1, 2, effective June 2.

L. 2010:

(1)(b)(III) and (1)(b)(IV) amended and (1)(b)(V) added, (HB 10-1140), ch. 138, p. 463, § 2, effective April 16.

L. 2013:

(1)(b)(I.5) repealed, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1692, § 89, effective August 7; (3.5)(c) added, (SB 13-235), ch. 400, p. 2336, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2014:

(1)(b)(I) amended, (SB 14-096), ch. 59, p. 274, § 32, effective August 6.

L. 2015:

(7)(b) repealed, SB 15-189, ch. 104, p. 305, § 7, effective April 16.

L. 2016:

(1)(a) and (2)(a) amended and (3.5) repealed, (HB 16-1408), ch. 153, p 472, §§ 25, 26, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(1)(c) amended, (HB 20-1380), ch. 170, p. 784, § 5, effective June 29.

L. 2021:

(1)(c) amended, (SB 21-266), ch. 423, p. 2804, § 30, effective July 2.

28-5-710. Board of veterans affairs - world war II memorial dedication - fund - grants - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 688, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2002, p. 688.)

28-5-711. Veterans resource information clearinghouse.

There is hereby created in the division of veterans affairs the veterans resource information clearinghouse to provide information concerning support, services, and other assistance available to veterans of the United States armed forces and their families from state and local government agencies and programs, congressionally chartered veterans organizations, and nonprofit service organizations. To the extent practicable, the division shall make information available through the veterans resource information clearinghouse in a variety of formats to help ensure a high degree of public accessibility.

The division shall identify the agencies, programs, services, and organizations to be included in the veterans resource information clearinghouse. The department of military and veterans affairs shall adopt policies to establish criteria that the division shall apply to ensure that the nonprofit service organizations included in the clearinghouse are legitimate, legally operated organizations.

The division shall operate the veterans resource information clearinghouse subject to available state and federal resources that are appropriated or otherwise available to the division. In addition, the division may solicit, accept, and expend public or private gifts, grants, and donations for the operation of the veterans resource information clearinghouse, including but not limited to donations of volunteer services and in-kind donations.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1291), ch. 385, p. 2088, § 2, effective August 5.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2009 act adding this section, see section 1 of chapter 385, Session Laws of Colorado 2009.